Washington statutes.
RCW 35.43.020

Construction.

The rule that statutes in derogation of the common law are to be strictly construed shall have no application to this and the following chapters relating to municipal local improvements but the same shall be liberally construed for the purpose of carrying out the objects for which intended.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.43.020. Prior: 1911 c 98 s 69; RRS s 9422.]